Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-2101. Purpose and findings.

The General Assembly recognizes that it is the responsibility of the State of Arkansas to:

Develop what constitutes an adequate education in Arkansas pursuant to the mandate of the Supreme Court and to conduct an adequacy study, which has been completed; and

Know how revenues of the State of Arkansas are being spent and whether true equality in educational opportunity is being achieved.

The General Assembly also recognizes that no one (1) study can fully define what is an adequate, efficient, and equitable education.

The General Assembly further recognizes that while the adequacy study performed in 2003 is an integral component toward satisfying the requirements imposed by the Supreme Court, the General Assembly has a continuing duty to assess what constitutes an adequate education in the State of Arkansas.

Therefore, because the State of Arkansas has an absolute duty to provide the school children of the State of Arkansas with an adequate education, the General Assembly finds that ensuring that an adequate and equitable system of public education is available in the State of Arkansas shall be the ongoing priority for the State of Arkansas.

Assess, evaluate, and monitor the entire spectrum of public education across the State of Arkansas to determine whether equal educational opportunity for an adequate education is being substantially afforded to the school children of the State of Arkansas and recommend any necessary changes;

Review and continue to evaluate what constitutes an adequate education in the State of Arkansas and recommend any necessary changes;

Review and continue to evaluate the method of providing equality of educational opportunity of the State of Arkansas and recommend any necessary changes;

Evaluate the effectiveness of any program implemented by a school, a school district, an education service cooperative, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, or the State Board of Education and recommend necessary changes;

Review the average teacher salary in the State of Arkansas in comparison to average teacher salaries in surrounding states and member states of the Southern Regional Education Board and make recommendations for any necessary changes to teacher salaries in the State of Arkansas established by law;

Review and continue to evaluate the costs of an adequate education for all students in the State of Arkansas, taking into account cost-of-living variances, diseconomies of scale, transportation variability, demographics, school districts with a disproportionate number of students who are economically disadvantaged or have educational disabilities, and other factors as deemed relevant, and recommend any necessary changes;

Review and continue to evaluate the amount of per-student expenditure necessary to provide an equal educational opportunity and the amount of state funds to be provided to school districts, based upon the cost of an adequate education and monitor the expenditures and distribution of state funds and recommend any necessary changes; and

Review and monitor the amount of funding provided by the State of Arkansas for an education system based on need and the amount necessary to provide an adequate educational system, not on the amount of funding available, and make recommendations for funding for each biennium.

Contingent upon the availability of funding, the House Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education, or both, may enter into an agreement with outside consultants or other experts as may be necessary to conduct the adequacy review as required under this section.

The study for subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) of this section shall be accomplished by:

Reviewing a report prepared by Arkansas Legislative Audit compiling all funding received by public schools for each program;

Reviewing the Arkansas academic standards developed by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

Reviewing the Arkansas Educational Support and Accountability Act, § 6-15-2901 et seq.;

Reviewing fiscal and facilities distress programs;

Reviewing the state's standing under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-10, as reauthorized by the Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95; and

[Repealed.]

Reviewing the specific programs identified for further study by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

The study for subdivision (a)(5) of this section shall be accomplished by comparing the average teacher salary in Arkansas with surrounding states and Southern Regional Education Board member states, including without limitation:

Comparing teacher salaries as adjusted by a cost of living index or a comparative wage index;

Reviewing the minimum teacher compensation salary schedule; and

Reviewing any related topics identified for further study by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

Depending on the availability of National Education Association data on teacher salaries in other states, the teacher salary comparison may be prepared as a supplement to the report after September 1.

The study for subdivision (a)(6) of this section shall be accomplished by reviewing:

Expenditures from:

Isolated school funding;

National school lunch student funding;

Declining enrollment funding;

Student growth funding; and

Special education funding;

Disparities in teacher salaries; and

Any related topics identified for further study by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

The study for subdivision (a)(7) of this section shall be accomplished by:

Completing an expenditure analysis and resource allocation review each biennium; and

Reviewing any related topics identified for further study by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

The study for subdivision (a)(8) of this section shall be accomplished by:

Using evidence-based research as the basis for recalibrating as necessary the state's system of funding public education;

Adjusting for the inflation or deflation of any appropriate component of the system of funding public education every two (2) years;

Reviewing legislation enacted or rules promulgated during the biennium covered by the study to determine the impact of the legislation and rules on educational adequacy-related public school costs; and

Reviewing any related topics identified for further study by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1204, § 3, provided: “The purpose of this act is to strengthen and preserve the integrity of the Continuing Adequacy Evaluation Act of 2004, Arkansas Code §10-3-2101 et seq., by further defining its provisions to ensure that future assessments, evaluations, and monitoring of the state's public education system by the General Assembly will continue to be conducted in a thorough, well-informed and meaningful manner.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (f) through (j).

The 2011 amendment inserted present (j)(3) and redesignated former (j)(3) as (j)(4).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (f)(1).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Arkansas academic standards” for “curriculum frameworks” in (f)(2); substituted “Arkansas Educational Support and Accountability Act, §6-15-2901 et seq.” for “Arkansas Comprehensive Testing, Assessment, and Accountability Program Act, §6-15-401 et seq” in (f)(3); deleted “academic” following “fiscal” in (f)(4); and substituted “Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-10, as reauthorized by the Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95” for “No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.” in (f)(5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 757 repealed (f)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education” and “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (c).

U.S. Code. The Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-10, as reauthorized by the Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95, is codified as 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.

Because adequacy reports and evaluations were filed after the release of the mandate in a previous school-funding case, res judicata did not bar a school district's challenge to them.Deer/Mt. Judea Sch. Dist. v. Kimbrell, 2013 Ark. 393, 430 S.W.3d 29 (2013).

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education or its successors; or

The State Board of Education or any division under the board's authority.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “§10-2-307” for “§10-3-208” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (a)(5); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(6).

By November 1 of the calendar year before the beginning of a fiscal session that is held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in May under § 7-7-203; and

By March 1 of the calendar year before the beginning of a fiscal session that is held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in March under § 7-7-203.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1204, § 3, provided:

“The purpose of this act is to strengthen and preserve the integrity of the Continuing Adequacy Evaluation Act of 2004, Arkansas Code §10-3-2101 et seq., by further defining its provisions to ensure that future assessments, evaluations, and monitoring of the state's public education system by the General Assembly will continue to be conducted in a thorough, well-informed and meaningful manner.”

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment to this section expired December 31, 2016. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 5, provided:

“(a)This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (c).

The 2009 amendment added (d).

The 2011 amendment substituted “November 1” for “September 1” in (a) and (d)(3); deleted “under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 5” following “session” in (d)(1); and added (e).

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “By March 1 of the calendar year of a fiscal session” for “By November 1 of the calendar year before the beginning of a fiscal session” in (d)(3).

The 2019 amendment deleted “By November 1 of the calendar year before the beginning of a fiscal session” at the beginning of (d)(3); and added (d)(3)(A) and (d)(3)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 1424, § 3: Mar. 30, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Supreme Court has determined that current public school academic facilities in the State of Arkansas are inadequate and inequitable; that the General Assembly established the Joint Committee on Educational Facilities to inventory the current condition of school facilities and recommend methods for bringing those facilities into conformity with the court's constitutional expectations; that one of the recommendations of the joint committee is to authorize the Division of Public School Academic Facilities to begin work immediately as a viable state agency; that the new division immediately needs, and will continue to need, the advice of an advisory committee comprised of members with expertise in public school design and construction and with issues particular to providing adequate and equitable public school academic facilities; that an advisory committee with the necessary expertise does not currently exist; that in response to the work of the joint committee, the General Assembly is in the process of developing and enacting legislation designed to establish a comprehensive program for overseeing the provision of adequate and substantially equal public school academic facilities across the state; that the General Assembly immediately needs, and will continue to need, the advice of an organized legislative committee comprised of members with expertise in issues particular to providing adequate and equitable public school academic facilities; and that an organized legislative committee with the necessary expertise does not currently exist. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 801, § 7: Apr. 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation needs an advisory committee with the necessary expertise in order to effectively carry out its mission; that clarity is needed in the law as to which entity has appointment authority over new members of the Advisory Committee on Public School Academic Facilities; that the State of Arkansas is in need of a comprehensive review of academic facilities programs to ensure that the most efficient and effective programs are in place; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to constitute an advisory committee to immediately begin the work required in this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The House Committee on Education or the Senate Committee on Education, separately or jointly, shall publish a draft of the report required under this section or any amendment or supplement to the report not less than fourteen (14) days before the report, amendment, or supplement is submitted to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

There is created a legislative committee to be known as the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

The Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall consist of fifteen (15) members as follows:

One (1) member who is the Chair of the Senate Committee on Education or his or her designee;

Two (2) members of the Senate Committee on Education appointed by the Chair of the Senate Committee on Education; and

Four (4) members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

In the event that the Chair of the Senate Committee on Education and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate are the same person, the Vice Chair of the Senate Committee on Education shall make the appointments under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii) of this section;

(A)Seven (7) members of the House of Representatives as follows:

One (1) member who is the Chair of the House Committee on Education or his or her designee;

Two (2) members of the House Committee on Education to be appointed by the Chair of the House Committee on Education; and

Four (4) members of the House to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

In the event that the Chair of the House Committee on Education and the Speaker of the House of Representatives are the same person, the Vice Chair of the House Committee on Education shall make the appointments under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section; and

The Director of the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member.

The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education or the chair's designee and the Chair of the House Committee on Education or the chair's designee shall serve as cochairs of the committee.

If a vacancy occurs in an appointed position for any reason, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

(1)The Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall meet upon the call of either or both of the cochairs of the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

The Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall:

Use the opinions of the Supreme Court in the matter of Lake View School District No. 25 v. Huckabee, 351 Ark. 31, 91 S.W.3d 472 (2002) and other legal precedent relevant to public school academic facilities.

Upon motion of the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee and approval by a quorum of the committee, the October 1 report deadline may be extended for a period to be determined by the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

The report shall include for each recommendation, proposed implementation schedules with timelines, specific steps, agencies and persons responsible, and resources needed.

When feasible, the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall propose plans, measures, and initiatives as recommendations for legislation or rules.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment repealed (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(3).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education”, “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education”, and “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education”.

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Division of Higher Education, the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, and the Division of Public School Accountability shall provide the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee with assistance as requested by the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

The Academic Facilities Oversight Committee may hire or contract with individuals or entities, both within the state and from out of state, for the purpose of obtaining staff or otherwise performing the duties of the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee to the extent funding is appropriated and available for that purpose.

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall furnish reasonable staff assistance to the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee as may be requested by the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

The Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall function during the interim between regular session, fiscal sessions, or special sessions of the General Assembly, while the General Assembly is in session, and while the General Assembly is in recess.

If the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee meets at a time when the General Assembly is not in session, the legislative members of the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee are entitled to per diem and mileage reimbursement at the rate for attending meetings of the Legislative Council. The per diem or mileage reimbursement shall be paid from funds appropriated for the payment of per diem and mileage for attendance at meetings of interim committees of the General Assembly.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “session, fiscal sessions” following “regular” in (a).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the title of the subchapter, expired by its own terms June 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 2000, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 14; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 14.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the creation of the Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Abused and Neglected Children, expired by its own terms June 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 2000, § 1; 2007, No. 1035, § 1; 2009, No. 494, § 1; 2011, No. 1149, §§ 1-3; 2013, No. 149, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 980, § 5; 2015, No. 296, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 15; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 15.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the duties of the Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Abused and Neglected Children, expired by its own terms June 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 2000, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 16; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 16.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Higher Education Remediation, Retention, and Graduation Rates, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 248, § 4. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-3-2401. Acts 2007, No. 570, § 1.

10-3-2402. Acts 2007, No. 570, § 1.

10-3-2403. Acts 2007, No. 570, § 1.

10-3-2404. Acts 2007, No. 570, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas Cyberinfrastructure Task Force Act, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, §§17-24. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-3-2501. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

10-3-2502. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

10-3-2503. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

10-3-2504. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 75; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 75.

10-3-2505. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

10-3-2506. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

10-3-2507. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

10-3-2508. Acts 2009, No. 978, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 57, § 1.

10-3-2102. Duties.

During each interim, the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education shall meet separately or jointly, as needed, to:

As a guidepost in conducting deliberations and reviews, the committees shall use the opinion of the Supreme Court in the matter of Lake View Sch. Dist. No. 25 v. Huckabee, 351 Ark. 31, 91 S.W.3d 472 (2002), and other legal precedent.

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Division of Career and Technical Education, and the Division of Higher Education shall provide the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education with assistance and information as requested by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

The Attorney General is requested to provide assistance to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education as needed.

History.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 57, § 1; 2005, No. 723, § 1; 2007, No. 1204, § 1; 2011, No. 725, § 1; 2015, No. 554, § 5; 2017, No. 936, § 55; 2019, No. 757, § 66; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2214-2216.

10-3-2103. Investigations.

The House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education shall have the authority to conduct investigations pertaining to the effectiveness of any and all education programs of:

Any school;

Any school district;

Any service cooperative;

Any institution;

(1)In connection with any investigation, the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education shall have the right and the power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoena duces tecum, pursuant to §10-2-307.

The chairs and the cochairs of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education are authorized to administer oaths.

History.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 57, § 1; 2013, No. 1465, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 2217.

10-3-2104. Report.

The House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education shall file separately or jointly, or both, reports of their findings and recommendations with the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than November 1 of each year before the convening of a regular session.

For each recommendation the report shall include proposed implementation schedules with timelines, specific steps, agencies and persons responsible, resources needed, and drafts of bills proposing all necessary and recommended legislative changes.

The report shall be supplemented as needed to accomplish the purposes of this continuing evaluation.

(1)Before a fiscal session, the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education shall meet, jointly or separately as needed, to review the funding recommendations contained in the most recent report filed under this section.

The House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education, meeting jointly or separately as needed, also shall review any other matters identified by the House Committee on Education or the Senate Committee on Education that may affect the state's obligation to provide a substantially equal opportunity for an adequate education for all public school students.

If the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education find that the recommendations in the most recent adequacy evaluation report filed under this section should be amended, the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education, jointly or separately, or both, shall advise in writing the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives of their findings and amendments to the adequacy evaluation report:

History.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 57, § 1; 2007, No. 1204, § 2; 2009, No. 199, § 1; 2011, No. 725, § 2; 2019, No. 545, § 7.

Subchapter 22

— Academic Facilities Oversight Committee

10-3-2201. Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

(A)Seven (7) members of the Senate as follows:

Eight (8) members of the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting business.

A quorum is required for any action of the Academic Facilities Oversight Committee.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1424, § 1.

10-3-2202. Powers and duties.

Oversee development and implementation of state statutory requirements with regard to providing constitutionally appropriate public school academic facilities and related equipment for all public schools in the State of Arkansas as necessary to provide an equal opportunity for an adequate education for all public school students in Arkansas;

[Repealed.]

Review and recommend policies and criteria for the repair, maintenance, renovation, remodeling, replacement, and construction of public school academic facilities;

Oversee local and state expenditures related to providing constitutionally appropriate public school academic facilities and related equipment;

Review the effectiveness of methods used to fund the cost of constitutionally appropriate public school academic facilities and equipment;

Review the ongoing assessment, evaluation, and inspection of public school academic facilities to provide that constitutionally appropriate public school academic facilities are, and will continue to be, provided for public school students in Arkansas; and

(1)(A)The Academic Facilities Oversight Committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Governor, the House Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Education no later than October 1 before each regular session of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1424, § 1; 2017, No. 801, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 748.

10-3-2203. Committee assistance.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1424, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2218.

10-3-2204. Meetings — Reimbursement of expenses.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1424, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 26.

Subchapter 23

— Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Abused and Neglected Children Act

10-3-2301. [Expired.]

10-3-2303. [Expired.]

10-3-2401 — 10-3-2404. [Repealed.]

10-3-2501 — 10-3-2508. [Repealed.]

10-3-2601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Autism Act”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1272, § 1.